Tennessee, session 114, SB1202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-124(a), is amended by adding
the following language after the second sentence:
Each list must be published on the court's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1202
002448
- 1 -